createYaml/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangising
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisininig
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisinzinog
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisinzininig
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisingiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisininigiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisinzinoogiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisinzininigiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisinogwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisininigwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisinzinoogwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisinzininiigwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisinogobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisininigobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: bangisinzinoogobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: bangisinzininigobanen
